Delaware, session 153, SB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter IX, Chapter 60, Title 7 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6099B. Expanded polystyrene foam. (a) For purposes of this section: (1) âDepartmentâ means the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control. (2) âExpanded polystyrene foam coolerâ means a portable container made of expanded polystyrene foam that is designed or intended to be used for cold storage of food. âExpanded polystyrene foam coolerâ does not include expanded polystyrene foam containers used for drugs, medical devices, or biological materials. (3) âExpanded polystyrene foam food service packagingâ means food service packaging made from expanded polystyrene foam, including cups, plates, bowls, trays, and hinged or lidded containers. âExpanded polystyrene foam food service packagingâ does not include expanded polystyrene foam products that are used to contain, transport, or package raw or butchered meat, poultry, fish, seafood, eggs, fruits, or vegetables. (4) âExpanded polystyrene foam loose fill packagingâ means a void-filling product made of expanded polystyrene foam that is used as a loose fill packing filler, such as packing peanuts. (5) âExpanded polystyrene foam productâ means a product made from expanded foam thermoplastics using a styrene monomer. âExpanded polystyrene foam productâ does not include products made from rigid polystyrene. (6) âFood service packagingâ means as defined in Â§ 3001Q of Title 16. (7) âPre-packagedâ means bottled, canned, bagged, wrapped, or otherwise packaged at a food processing plant or before arriving at a retail store or wholesaler. (8) âRetail storeâ means a person or establishment located in this State and engaged in the business of selling or exchanging goods for cash, barter, or any consideration with the intent that the purchaser of the goods has acquired the goods for ultimate consumption or use and not resale, and that sells, offers for sale, or distributes expanded polystyrene foam food service packaging, expanded polystyrene foam coolers, or expanded polystyrene foam loose fill packaging in this State. âRetail storeâ does not include a food establishment as defined in the Delaware Food Code, Regulation 4458 of Title 16 of the Delaware Administrative Code [16 DE Admin. Code 4458], as the use of polystyrene foam food service packaging in food establishments is covered under Â§ 3004Q of Title 16. (9) âRigid polystyreneâ means polystyrene made from rigid, polystyrene resin that has not been expanded, extruded, or foamed. (10) âWholesalerâ means a person or company located in this State and engaged in the business of selling goods primarily to retailers, merchants, or industrial, institutional, or commercial users mainly for resale or business use and that sells, offers for sale, or distributes expanded polystyrene foam food service packaging, expanded polystyrene foam coolers, or expanded polystyrene foam loose fill packaging in this State. (b) A retail store or wholesaler may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute expanded polystyrene foam food service packaging, expanded polystyrene foam coolers, or expanded polystyrene foam loose fill packaging in this State, except for the following: (1) Portion cups of 2 ounces or less, if used for hot foods requiring lids. (2) Meat or fish trays for raw or butchered meat, including poultry or fish that is sold from a refrigerator, freezer, or similar appliance, except that under no circumstance may black expanded polystyrene foam food service packaging be used. (3) Expanded polystyrene foam coolers if used to transport or ship food products that require cold storage. (4) Expanded polystyrene foam coolers if used to transport or ship live fish or other marine life. (5) Expanded polystyrene foam food service packaging containing pre-packaged food products. (c) The Department may, upon written application, waive the provisions of subsection (b) of this section for a retail store or wholesaler for a period not to exceed 1 year if there is not a financially feasible and commercially available alternative for a specific expanded polystyrene foam product and the retail store or wholesaler can show that the ban will cause significant financial hardship. The 1-year waiver is renewable upon the approval of a written application to the Department. (d) The Department shall prescribe the form and manner of the application for a waiver under subsection (c) of this section. (e) The Department may adopt rules, regulations, and procedures necessary to implement this section. Section 2. Amend Â§ 6099A of Title 7 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6099A. At-store recycling program. (a) For purposes of this subchapter, section, the following definitions shall apply: Section 3. This Act takes effect on January 1, 2027.